Washington statutes.
RCW 9.03.030

Violation of RCW 9.03.010 or 9.03.020.

Guilt of a violation of RCW 9.03.010 or 9.03.020 shall not, in itself, render one guilty of manslaughter, battery, or other crime against a person who may suffer death or injury from entrapment in such refrigerator, icebox, or deep freeze locker.

[ 1955 c 298 s 3.]